trunk/apertium-es-ssp/apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimowraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimowraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>elohsòmimuca:aeimowraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elohsòmimuca:aeimowraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylohsòmimuca:aeimíwraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylohsòmimuca:aeimíwraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylohsòmimuca:aeimèwraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylohsòmimuca:aeimèwraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeiméwraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:aeiméwraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elohsòmimuca:aeimywraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elohsòmimuca:aeimywraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylohsòmimuca:aeimiwraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylohsòmimuca:aeimiwraiheb</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>





<pardef n="/emimuwe__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 

<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwo</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwo</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>elemèmuwo</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elemèmuwo</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyledoho</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyledoho</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwery</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwe</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwery</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylewei</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyleweiby</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuwey</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emimuweyboy</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elememuwy</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elememuwybo</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylememuwi</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylememuwibo</l> 
        <r>emimuwe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb"><par n="/ohsòmimuca:aeimewraiheb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="emimuwe"><par n="/emimuwe__vblex"/></e>
